Utah statutes.
52-4-304.   Action challenging closed meeting.
(1)  Notwithstanding the procedure established under Subsection 63G-2-202(7),
in any action brought under the authority of this chapter to challenge the
legality of a closed meeting held by a public body, the court shall:
(a)  review the recording or written minutes of the closed meeting in camera;
and
(b)  decide the legality of the closed meeting.
(2) (a)  If the judge determines that the public body did not violate Section
52-4-204, 52-4-205, or 52-4-206 regarding closed meetings, the judge shall
dismiss the case without disclosing or revealing any information from the
recording or minutes of the closed meeting.
(b)  If the judge determines that the public body violated Section 52-4-204,
52-4-205, or 52-4-206 regarding closed meetings, the judge shall publicly
disclose or reveal from the recording or minutes of the closed meeting all
information about the portion of the meeting that was illegally closed.
